Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1014.
do enact as follows:SB1014,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1014,2,72(1) Wisconsin deflection initiative expansion. During the 2025-27 fiscal 3biennium, the department of justice shall implement a pilot program to expand the 4Wisconsin deflection initiative by providing grants to Wisconsin deflection 5initiative sites that are active participants in the Wisconsin deflection initiative on 6the effective date of this subsection. Grants may be awarded under this subsection 7for any of the following purposes:SB1014,2,88(a) To hire additional employees to provide deflection care coordination.SB1014,2,109(b) To contract with outside vendors for consultations and program 10evaluations.SB1014,2,1111(c) To acquire deflection care coordination technology.SB1014,2,1412(d) 1. To contract with an outside vendor to acquire deflection care 13coordination technology. To obtain a contract under this paragraph, a vendor shall 14meet all of the following qualifications: SB1014,2,1615a. The vendor shall have a fully developed system for deflection care 16coordination at the time the contract is executed.SB1014,2,1917b. The vendor shall have a minimum of 5 years of experience supporting 18multisite deflection initiatives that are comparable to the Wisconsin deflection 19initiative.SB1014,3,220c. The vendor shall be able to provide a deflection care coordination system 21that meets all legal requirements and standards, including privacy protections, the 22federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, and 42 CFR part 2, 1security requirements, and compliance with other applicable laws and best 2practices.SB1014,3,832. A Wisconsin deflection initiative site shall give preference under subd. 1. to 4a vendor that is recommended by a current Wisconsin deflection initiative site, that 5has functionality and flexibility with application programming interfaces, and 6whose technology can be customized to reflect the specific resources available to the 7site, including the ability to securely collect referrals from supporting organizations 8or individuals.SB1014,3,139(2) Wisconsin deflection initiative; onetime funding. Notwithstanding 10s. 16.42 (1) (e), in submitting information under s. 16.42 for the 2027-29 biennial 11budget bill, the department of justice shall submit information concerning the 12appropriation under s. 20.455 (1) (a) as though the increase in the dollar amount of 13that appropriation by Section 2 (1) and (2) of this act did not take effect.SB1014,214Section 2. Fiscal changes.SB1014,3,2115(1) Wisconsin deflection initiative. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for 16the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (1) (a), the dollar 17amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $400,000 to expand the Wisconsin 18deflection initiative as provided in Section 1 (1) of this act. In the schedule under 19s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (1) 20(a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $400,000 to expand the 21Wisconsin deflection initiative as provided in Section 1 (1) of this act.SB1014,4,522(2) Wisconsin deflection initiative position authority. In the schedule 23under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 2420.455 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $107,100 to 1increase the authorized FTE positions for the department by 1.0 GPR position to 2expand the Wisconsin deflection initiative as provided in Section 1 (1) of this act. 3In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of 4justice under s. 20.455 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased 5by $107,100 to provide funding for the position authorized under this subsection.SB1014,4,66